Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6099.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:The department shall suspend enforcement, collection, or both, for any tax law change increasing the tax liability of taxpayers from the date the tax takes effect to the first day of the calendar quarter after the department finalizes rule making related to the tax law change.--- END ---